Hawaii statutes.
§328-98 Pharmacist liability. A
pharmacist who selects an equivalent generic drug product or an interchangeable
biological product pursuant to this part assumes no greater liability for
selecting the dispensed drug product than would be incurred in filling a
prescription for a drug product prescribed by its established name. [L 1980, c
187, pt of §1; am L 1996, c 209, §7; am L 2016, c 242, §8]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next